Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-223
Violations; penalty.

Any person violating the provisions of section 79-214, 79-217, 79-219, or 79-220 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1979, LB 59, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-444.05;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 27.